Connecticut, session 2026, HB05043.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 53-202 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section: (1) "Machine gun" [shall apply to and
include] means (A) a weapon of any description, loaded or unloaded,
[which] that shoots, is designed to shoot or can be readily restored to
shoot automatically more than one projectile, without manual
reloading, by a single function of the trigger, including any convertible
pistol that is equipped with a pistol converter, as defined in subsection
(c) of section 53-206g, as amended by this act, and [shall also include]
(B) any part or combination of parts designed for use in converting a
weapon into a machine gun and any combination of parts from which a
machine gun can be assembled if such parts are in the possession of or
under the control of a person. (2) "Crime of violence" [shall apply to and
include] means any of the following-named crimes or an attempt to
commit any of the same: Murder, manslaughter, kidnapping, sexual

Substitute House Bill No. 5043
assault and sexual assault with a firearm, assault in the first or second
degree, robbery, burglary, larceny and riot in the first degree. (3)
"Projectile" means any size bullet that when affixed to any cartridge case
may be propelled through the bore of a machine gun. (4) "Convertible
pistol" means any semiautomatic pistol with a cruciform trigger bar that
can be readily altered by hand or with a common household tool so that
the pistol can be readily converted into a machine gun by the installation
or attachment of a pistol converter, as defined in subsection (c) of section
53-206g, as amended by this act. "Convertible pistol" does not include
(A) any hammer-fired semiautomatic pistol, or (B) any semiautomatic
pistol with a cruciform trigger bar that has a tab or other piece of
material molded to the pistol's frame that shields the cruciform trigger
bar from interference by a pistol converter, unless the tab or other piece
of material can be readily removed from the pistol's frame. (5)
"Cruciform trigger bar" means a component in a semiautomatic pistol
that serves as a linkage between the trigger and firing pin and has its
sear incorporated in a cross-shaped surface. (6) "Common household
tool" includes, but is not limited to, a knife, screwdriver, wrench,
hacksaw, crowbar, electric drill, rotary tool, hammer, chisel, file or
pliers.
Sec. 2. Subsection (c) of section 53-206g of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(c) For purposes of this section, (1) "firearm" means firearm as defined
in section 53a-3, as amended by this act, [and] (2) "rate of fire
enhancement" means (A) any device, component, part, combination of
parts, attachment or accessory that: [(1)] (i) Uses energy from the recoil
of a firearm to generate a reciprocating action that causes repeated
function of the trigger, including, but not limited to, a bump stock; [(2)]
(ii) repeatedly pulls or forcibly resets the trigger of a firearm through the
use of a crank, lever or other part, including, but not limited to, a trigger
Public Act No. 26-41 2 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5043
crank or forced reset trigger; or [(3)] (iii) causes a semiautomatic firearm
to fire more than one round per operation of the trigger, where the
trigger pull and reset constitute a single operation of the trigger,
including, but not limited to, a binary trigger system or a pistol
converter, or (B) any other device, part, combination of parts, kit, tool or
accessory that is not necessary for the function of the pistol and that,
when built into, installed in or attached to the pistol, increases the rate
of fire above the rate at which a person can fire the firearm without the
device, part, combination of parts, kit, tool or accessory, and (3) "pistol
converter" means any device or instrument that, when installed in or
attached to the rear of the slide of a semiautomatic pistol, interferes with
the trigger mechanism, thereby enabling the pistol to discharge a
number of shots or bullets rapidly or automatically with one continuous
pull of the trigger.
Sec. 3. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) Any individual or firm,
partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association or other
similar entity that knowingly imports into this state or knowingly
advertises, sells, offers or exposes for sale any convertible pistol, as
defined in section 53-202 of the general statutes, as amended by this act,
that was manufactured on or after October 1, 2026, shall be guilty of a
class D felony.
(b) The provisions of this section shall not apply to sale at retail or
other lawful transfer of a convertible pistol by a person who is not a
licensed gun dealer to another person who is not a licensed gun dealer.
Sec. 4. Section 53a-3 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
Except where different meanings are expressly specified, the
following terms have the following meanings when used in this title:
Public Act No. 26-41 3 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5043
(1) "Person" means a human being, and, where appropriate, a public
or private corporation, a limited liability company, an unincorporated
association, a partnership, a government or a governmental
instrumentality;
(2) "Possess" means to have physical possession or otherwise to
exercise dominion or control over tangible property;
(3) "Physical injury" means impairment of physical condition or pain;
(4) "Serious physical injury" means physical injury which creates a
substantial risk of death, or which causes serious disfigurement, serious
impairment of health or serious loss or impairment of the function of
any bodily organ;
(5) "Deadly physical force" means physical force which can be
reasonably expected to cause death or serious physical injury;
(6) "Deadly weapon" means any weapon, whether loaded or
unloaded, from which a shot may be discharged, or a switchblade knife,
gravity knife, billy, blackjack, bludgeon, or metal knuckles. The
definition of "deadly weapon" in this subdivision shall be deemed not
to apply to section 29-38 or 53-206 and does not include an electronic
defense weapon when used by a peace officer;
(7) "Dangerous instrument" means any instrument, article or
substance which, under the circumstances in which it is used or
attempted or threatened to be used, is capable of causing death or
serious physical injury, and includes a "vehicle" as that term is defined
in this section and includes a dog that has been commanded to attack,
except a dog owned by a law enforcement agency of the state or any
political subdivision thereof or of the federal government when such
dog is in the performance of its duties under the direct supervision, care
and control of an assigned law enforcement officer;
Public Act No. 26-41 4 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5043
(8) "Vehicle" means a "motor vehicle" as defined in section 14-1, a
snowmobile, any aircraft, or any vessel equipped for propulsion by
mechanical means or sail;
(9) "Peace officer" means a member of the Division of State Police
within the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection or
an organized local police department, a chief inspector or inspector in
the Division of Criminal Justice, a state marshal while exercising
authority granted under any provision of the general statutes, a judicial
marshal in the performance of the duties of a judicial marshal, a
conservation officer or special conservation officer, as defined in section
26-5, a constable who performs criminal law enforcement duties, a
special policeman appointed under section 29-18, 29-18a, 29-18b or 29-
19, an adult probation officer, an official of the Department of Correction
authorized by the Commissioner of Correction to make arrests in a
correctional institution or facility, any investigator in the investigations
unit of the office of the State Treasurer, an inspector of motor vehicles in
the Department of Motor Vehicles, who is certified under the provisions
of sections 7-294a to 7-294e, inclusive, a United States marshal or deputy
marshal, any special agent of the federal government authorized to
enforce the provisions of Title 21 of the United States Code, or a member
of a law enforcement unit of the Mashantucket Pequot Tribe or the
Mohegan Tribe of Indians of Connecticut created and governed by a
memorandum of agreement under section 47-65c who is certified as a
police officer by the Police Officer Standards and Training Council
pursuant to sections 7-294a to 7-294e, inclusive;
(10) "Firefighter" means any agent of a municipality whose duty it is
to protect life and property therein as a member of a duly constituted
fire department whether professional or volunteer;
(11) A person acts "intentionally" with respect to a result or to conduct
described by a statute defining an offense when his conscious objective
is to cause such result or to engage in such conduct;
Public Act No. 26-41 5 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5043
(12) A person acts "knowingly" with respect to conduct or to a
circumstance described by a statute defining an offense when he is
aware that his conduct is of such nature or that such circumstance exists;
(13) A person acts "recklessly" with respect to a result or to a
circumstance described by a statute defining an offense when he is
aware of and consciously disregards a substantial and unjustifiable risk
that such result will occur or that such circumstance exists. The risk
must be of such nature and degree that disregarding it constitutes a
gross deviation from the standard of conduct that a reasonable person
would observe in the situation;
(14) A person acts with "criminal negligence" with respect to a result
or to a circumstance described by a statute defining an offense when he
fails to perceive a substantial and unjustifiable risk that such result will
occur or that such circumstance exists. The risk must be of such nature
and degree that the failure to perceive it constitutes a gross deviation
from the standard of care that a reasonable person would observe in the
situation;
(15) "Machine gun" means a weapon of any description, irrespective
of size, by whatever name known, loaded or unloaded, from which a
number of shots or bullets may be rapidly or automatically discharged
from a magazine with one continuous pull of the trigger and includes a
submachine gun and any convertible pistol, as defined in section 53-202,
as amended by this act, that is in the possession of an individual person
who is also in the possession of a pistol converter, as defined in
subsection (c) of section 53-206g, as amended by this act;
(16) "Rifle" means a weapon designed or redesigned, made or
remade, and intended to be fired from the shoulder and designed or
redesigned and made or remade to use the energy of the explosive in a
fixed metallic cartridge to fire only a single projectile through a rifled
bore for each single pull of the trigger;
Public Act No. 26-41 6 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5043
(17) "Shotgun" means a weapon designed or redesigned, made or
remade, and intended to be fired from the shoulder and designed or
redesigned and made or remade to use the energy of the explosive in a
fixed shotgun shell to fire through a smooth bore either a number of ball
shot or a single projectile for each single pull of the trigger;
(18) "Pistol" or "revolver" means any firearm having a barrel less than
twelve inches;
(19) "Firearm" means any sawed-off shotgun, machine gun, rifle,
shotgun, pistol, revolver or other weapon, whether loaded or unloaded
from which a shot may be discharged;
(20) "Electronic defense weapon" means a weapon which by
electronic impulse or current is capable of immobilizing a person
temporarily, including a stun gun or other conductive energy device;
(21) "Martial arts weapon" means a nunchaku, kama, kasari-fundo,
octagon sai, tonfa or chinese star;
(22) "Employee of an emergency medical service organization" means
an ambulance driver, emergency medical technician or paramedic as
defined in section 19a-175;
(23) "Railroad property" means all tangible property owned, leased
or operated by a railroad carrier including, but not limited to, a right-of-
way, track, roadbed, bridge, yard, shop, station, tunnel, viaduct, trestle,
depot, warehouse, terminal or any other structure or appurtenance or
equipment owned, leased or used in the operation of a railroad carrier
including a train, locomotive, engine, railroad car, signals or safety
device or work equipment or rolling stock;
(24) "Serious firearm offense" means a violation of section 29-36, 29-
36a, as amended by this act, or 53-202w, possession of a stolen firearm
or a firearm that is altered in a manner that renders the firearm
Public Act No. 26-41 7 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5043
unlawful, or any crime of which an essential element is that the person
discharged, used or was armed with and threatened the use of a firearm;
and
(25) "Serious firearm offender" means a person who has (A) two
convictions for a serious firearm offense, (B) a conviction for a serious
firearm offense and was previously convicted of a violation of section
29-36, 29-36a, as amended by this act, subdivision (1) of subsection (a)
of section 53a-217 or subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of section 53a-217c,
or (C) a conviction for a serious firearm offense and was previously
convicted of two or more additional felony offenses.
Sec. 5. Section 53-206j of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) No person shall purchase or receive or sell, deliver or otherwise
transfer an unfinished frame or unfinished lower receiver, except as
provided in: (1) Subsections (b) and (c) of this section; or (2) subsection
(d) of this section; or (3) subsection (e) of this section.
(b) The procedures for the purchase or receipt or sale, delivery or
other transfer of an unfinished frame or unfinished lower receiver shall
be the same procedures as apply to the purchase or receipt or sale,
delivery or other transfer of a pistol or revolver under subsections (b) to
(e), inclusive, of section 29-33, provided such purchase or receipt or sale,
delivery or other transfer of an unfinished frame or unfinished lower
receiver is in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c) of this
section.
(c) (1) No person shall sell, deliver or otherwise transfer an unfinished
frame or unfinished lower receiver pursuant to subsection (b) of this
section that does not have a unique serial number or other mark of
identification, obtained pursuant to: (A) The serial numbering program
of the federal Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives, or
Public Act No. 26-41 8 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5043
(B) subdivisions (2) and (3) of this subsection.
(2) A person may obtain a unique serial number or other mark of
identification for an unfinished frame or unfinished lower receiver by
providing to the Department of Emergency Services and Public
Protection any identifying information concerning the unfinished frame
or unfinished lower receiver and the owner of such unfinished frame or
unfinished lower receiver, in a manner prescribed by the Commissioner
of Emergency Services and Public Protection. Upon receiving a properly
submitted request for a unique serial number or other mark of
identification for an unfinished frame or unfinished lower receiver, the
Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection shall
determine if such person is prohibited from purchasing a firearm, and
if not, shall issue to such person a unique serial number or other mark
of identification immediately and in no instance more than (A) three
business days after the Department of Emergency Services and Public
Protection receives such request, or (B) ten business days after the
system to distribute a unique serial number or other mark of
identification pursuant to section 29-36b, as amended by this act, is
operational, whichever date is later.
(3) Such unique serial number or other mark of identification shall be
engraved upon or permanently affixed to the unfinished frame or
unfinished lower receiver in a manner that conforms with the
requirements imposed on licensed importers and licensed
manufacturers of firearms pursuant to 18 USC 923(i), as amended from
time to time, and any regulation adopted thereunder.
(d) The provisions of subsections (a) to (c), inclusive, of this section
shall not apply to the sale, delivery or transfer of any unfinished frame
or unfinished lower receiver between (1) a federally licensed firearm
manufacturer and a federally licensed firearm dealer, (2) a federally
licensed firearm importer and a federally licensed firearm dealer, or (3)
federally licensed firearm dealers.
Public Act No. 26-41 9 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5043
(e) Any person may arrange in advance to deliver and transfer an
unfinished frame or unfinished lower receiver to a police department or
the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection.
(f) On and after October 1, 2019, no person shall possess an unfinished
frame or unfinished lower receiver unless such person is eligible to
purchase a firearm under state and federal law.
(g) If the court finds that a violation of this section is not of a serious
nature and that the person charged with such violation (1) will probably
not offend in the future, (2) has not previously been convicted of a
violation of this section, and (3) has not previously had a prosecution
under this section suspended pursuant to this subsection, the court may
order suspension of prosecution. The court shall not order suspension
of prosecution unless the accused person has acknowledged that he or
she understands the consequences of the suspension of prosecution.
Any person for whom prosecution is suspended shall agree to the
tolling of any statute of limitations with respect to such violation and to
a waiver of his or her right to a speedy trial. Such person shall appear in
court and shall be released to the supervision of the Court Support
Services Division for such period, not exceeding two years, and under
such conditions as the court shall order. If the person refuses to accept,
or, having accepted, violates such conditions, the court shall terminate
the suspension of prosecution and the case shall be brought to trial. If
such person satisfactorily completes such person's period of probation,
he or she may apply for dismissal of the charges against such person
and the court, on finding such satisfactory completion, shall dismiss
such charges. If the person does not apply for dismissal of the charges
against such person after satisfactorily completing such person's period
of probation, the court, upon receipt of a report submitted by the Court
Support Services Division that the person satisfactorily completed such
person's period of probation, may on its own motion make a finding of
such satisfactory completion and dismiss such charges. Upon dismissal,
Public Act No. 26-41 10 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5043
all records of such charges shall be erased pursuant to section 54-142a.
An order of the court denying a motion to dismiss the charges against a
person who has completed such person's period of probation or
terminating the participation of a defendant in such program shall be a
final judgment for purposes of appeal.
(h) Any person who violates any provision of this section shall be
guilty of a class C felony for which two years of the sentence imposed
may not be suspended or reduced by the court, and five thousand
dollars of the fine imposed may not be remitted or reduced by the court
unless the court states on the record its reasons for remitting or reducing
such fine, except that any person who sells, delivers or otherwise
transfers an unfinished frame or unfinished lower receiver in violation
of the provisions of this section knowing that such unfinished frame or
unfinished lower receiver is stolen or that the manufacturer's number or
other mark of identification on such unfinished frame or unfinished
lower receiver has been altered, removed or obliterated, shall be guilty
of a class B felony for which three years of the sentence imposed may
not be suspended or reduced by the court, and ten thousand dollars of
the fine imposed may not be remitted or reduced by the court unless the
court states on the record its reasons for remitting or reducing such fine,
and any unfinished frame or unfinished lower receiver found in the
possession of any person in violation of any provision of this section
shall be forfeited.
(i) For purposes of this section, ["unfinished frame or lower receiver"]
"unfinished frame or unfinished lower receiver" means a blank, casting,
[or machined body intended to be turned into the frame or lower
receiver of a firearm, as defined in section 53a-3, with additional
machining, and which has been formed or machined to the point where
most major machining operations have been completed to turn the
blank, casting or machined body into a frame or lower receiver of a
firearm, even if the fire-control cavity area of such blank, casting or
Public Act No. 26-41 11 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5043
machined body is still completely solid and unmachined. An
"unfinished frame or lower receiver" is not a firearm, as defined in 18
USC 921(a), as amended from time to time] forging, printing, extrusion,
machined body or similar item that (1) has reached a stage in
manufacture where it may readily be completed into the frame or
receiver of a functional firearm; or (2) is marketed or sold to the public
to become or be used as the frame or receiver of a functional firearm
once completed.
Sec. 6. Subsection (b) of section 29-28 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(b) (1) No person who sells ten or more firearms in a calendar year or
is a federally licensed firearm dealer shall advertise, sell, deliver, or offer
or expose for sale or delivery, or have in such person's possession with
intent to sell or deliver, any pistol or revolver at retail without having a
permit therefor issued as provided in this subsection. No individual or
firm, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association or
other similar entity may within this state advertise, sell, deliver or offer
or expose for sale or delivery, or have in such individual's or firm's,
partnership's, corporation's, limited liability company's, association's or
other similar entity's possession with the intent to sell at retail or deliver,
any unfinished frame or unfinished lower receiver, as defined in section
53-206j, as amended by this act, without having a permit therefor issued
as provided in this subsection.
(2) The local permitting authority may, upon the application of any
person, issue a permit in such form as may be prescribed by the
Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection for the sale
at retail of firearms within the jurisdiction of the local permitting
authority. No permit for the sale at retail of firearms shall be issued
unless the applicant holds a valid eligibility certificate for a pistol or
revolver issued pursuant to section 29-36f or a valid state permit to carry
Public Act No. 26-41 12 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5043
a pistol or revolver issued pursuant to subsection (c) of this section; and
the applicant submits documentation sufficient to establish that local
zoning requirements have been met for the location where the sale is to
take place, except that any person selling or exchanging a pistol or
revolver for the enhancement of a personal collection or for a hobby or
who sells all or part of such person's personal collection of pistols or
revolvers shall not be required to submit such documentation for the
location where the sale or exchange is to take place.
(3) Any person holding a valid permit for the sale at retail of pistols
or revolvers issued on or before September 30, 2023, shall be deemed to
be a holder of a valid permit for the sale at retail of firearms until such
permit for the sale at retail of pistols or revolvers expires or is revoked,
suspended, confiscated or surrendered. The holder of such permit may
renew such permit as a permit for the sale at retail of firearms pursuant
to section 29-30, as amended by this act.
Sec. 7. Subdivision (2) of section 52-571o of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(2) "Firearm industry product" means any of the following which are
or were (A) sold, made or distributed in this state; or (B) possessed in
this state and it was known by the firearm industry member that such
product would be sold, made, distributed or possessed in this state:
(i) Ammunition or a magazine as those terms are defined in section
29-38m;
(ii) A firearm as defined in section 53a-3, as amended by this act;
(iii) An unfinished frame or unfinished lower receiver as defined in
section 53-206j, as amended by this act; or
(iv) A rate of [firearm] fire enhancement as defined in section 53-206g,
Public Act No. 26-41 13 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5043
as amended by this act.
Sec. 8. Subsection (d) of section 29-36a of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(d) The provisions of subsections (a), (b) and (c) of this section shall
not apply to the manufacture of a firearm manufactured using an
unfinished frame or unfinished lower receiver, as defined in section 53-
206j, as amended by this act, on which a serial number or other mark
has been engraved or permanently affixed pursuant to subsection (c) of
section 53-206j, as amended by this act.
Sec. 9. Section 29-36b of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
Not later than October 1, 2019, the Department of Emergency Services
and Public Protection, in consultation with the federal Bureau of
Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives as needed, shall develop and
maintain a system to distribute a unique serial number or other mark of
identification to any person requesting such number or mark pursuant
to section 29-36a or 53-206j, as amended by this act, and provide written
notification that such system is operational by: (1) Posting the
notification on the department's Internet web site, and (2) providing the
notification electronically to federally licensed firearm dealers. The
department shall maintain identifying information of the person
requesting the number or mark and of the firearm or unfinished frame
or unfinished lower receiver, as defined in section 53-206j, as amended
by this act, for which each such number or mark is requested.
Sec. 10. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) Any individual may, at
any time, deliver or surrender any firearm, as defined in section 53a-3
of the general statutes, as amended by this act, or ammunition in the
possession of such individual to the Commissioner of Emergency
Public Act No. 26-41 14 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5043
Services and Public Protection for a period of not less than fourteen
days, provided a local police department may accept such firearm or
ammunition on behalf of said commissioner. The commissioner or local
police department shall exercise due care in the receipt and holding of
such firearm or ammunition.
(b) An individual who delivers or surrenders a firearm or
ammunition to the Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public
Protection or a local police department may request the return of such
firearm or ammunition on or after the fifteenth day after the date of such
delivery or surrender, but not later than two years after such date. Such
request shall include a completed and signed form promulgated
pursuant to subsection (b) of section 11 of this act.
(c) Not later than five days after receiving a request pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section, the commissioner or a local police
department shall review the request and make available for retrieval
any firearm or ammunition to such individual, provided the
commissioner or local police department confirms that such individual
(1) submitted the signed form required pursuant to subsection (b) of this
section, (2) is not otherwise disqualified from possessing such firearm
or ammunition, and (3) was legally entitled to possess such firearm or
ammunition at the time of delivery or surrender to the commissioner or
a local police department. If such firearm or ammunition has not been
collected by the individual at the end of the two-year period
immediately following the date of delivery or surrender of such firearm
or ammunition, the commissioner or a local police department, as
applicable, shall cause such firearm or ammunition to be destroyed. Not
later than ninety days prior to such destruction, the commissioner or
local police department, as applicable, shall notify, in writing, the
individual who delivered or surrendered the firearm or ammunition of
the date of such destruction.
Sec. 11. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) Not later than thirty days
Public Act No. 26-41 15 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5043
after the effective date of this section, the Commissioner of Emergency
Services and Public Protection shall, within available appropriations,
provide written notification of the provisions of section 10 of this act by
posting the notification on the Department of Emergency Services and
Public Protection's Internet web site. Such notification shall include
directions concerning how an individual who delivers or surrenders
any firearm, as defined in section 53a-3 of the general statutes, as
amended by this act, or ammunition in the possession of such individual
to the Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection for a
period of not less than fourteen days, may on or after the fifteenth day
after the date of such delivery or surrender, but not later than two years
after such date, request the return of such firearm or ammunition, and
which requirements the individual must satisfy in order to have such
firearm or ammunition returned to such person. Such notice shall also
provide that such firearm or ammunition shall be destroyed if not
collected by the individual before the end of the two-year period
immediately following the date of delivery or surrender of a firearm or
ammunition.
(b) On or before October 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Emergency
Services and Public Protection shall promulgate and make available on
the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection's Internet
web site a form to be signed by any individual who is seeking the return
of a firearm or ammunition pursuant to section 10 of this act.
Sec. 12. Subsections (a) to (e), inclusive, of section 29-30 of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes are repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The fee for each permit originally issued under the provisions of
subsection (b) of section 29-28, as amended by this act, for the sale at
retail of firearms shall be two hundred dollars and the fee for each
renewal of such permit shall be two hundred dollars. The fee for each
state permit originally issued under the provisions of subsection (c) of
Public Act No. 26-41 16 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5043
section 29-28, for the carrying of pistols and revolvers shall be one
hundred forty dollars plus sufficient funds as required to be transmitted
to the Federal Bureau of Investigation to cover the cost of a national
criminal history records check. The local permitting authority, as
defined in section 29-28, as amended by this act, or the chief of police of
a law enforcement unit of any federally recognized Native American
tribe within the borders of the state, as referenced in subsection (c) of
section 29-28, shall forward sufficient funds for the national criminal
history records check to the commissioner no later than five business
days after receipt by the local permitting authority, or such chief of
police of a law enforcement unit of any federally recognized Native
American tribe, of the application for the temporary state permit.
[Seventy] Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, seventy
dollars shall be retained by the local permitting authority, or such chief
of police of a law enforcement unit of any federally recognized Native
American tribe. Upon approval by the local permitting authority, or
such chief of police of a law enforcement unit of any federally
recognized Native American tribe, of the application for a temporary
state permit, seventy dollars shall be sent to the commissioner. The fee
to renew each state permit originally issued under the provisions of
subsection (c) of section 29-28 shall be seventy dollars. Upon deposit of
such fees in the General Fund, ten dollars of each fee shall be credited
within thirty days to the appropriation for the Department of
Emergency Services and Public Protection to a separate nonlapsing
account for the purposes of the issuance of permits under subsections
(b) and (c) of section 29-28, as amended by this act.
(b) A local permit originally issued before October 1, 2001, whether
for the sale at retail of pistols and revolvers or for the carrying of pistols
and revolvers, shall expire five years after the date it becomes effective
and each renewal of such permit shall expire five years after the
expiration date of the permit being renewed. On and after October 1,
2001, no local permit for the carrying of pistols and revolvers shall be
Public Act No. 26-41 17 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5043
renewed.
(c) A state permit originally issued under the provisions of section 29-
28, as amended by this act, for the carrying of pistols and revolvers shall
expire five years after the date such permit becomes effective and each
renewal of such permit shall expire five years after the expiration date
of the state permit being renewed and such renewal shall not be
contingent on the renewal or issuance of a local permit. A temporary
state permit issued for the carrying of pistols and revolvers shall expire
sixty days after the date it becomes effective, and may not be renewed.
(d) The renewal fee required pursuant to subsection (a) of this section
shall apply for each renewal which is requested not earlier than thirty-
one days before, and not later than thirty-one days after, the expiration
date of the state permit being renewed.
(e) No fee or portion of any fee paid under the provisions of this
section for issuance or renewal of a state permit shall be refundable
except if (1) such permit for which the fee or portion was paid was not
issued or renewed, or (2) the local permitting authority fails to discharge
any obligation applicable to such local permitting authority pursuant to
subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of section 29-28a or subsection (b) or (c)
of section 29-29 within the applicable time limits established under said
subdivision or subsections, in which case the local permitting authority
shall refund seventy dollars to the applicant. A refund issued pursuant
to the provisions of subdivision (2) of this subsection shall not alleviate
the local permitting authority from discharging any obligation specified
in said subdivision or subsections after such applicable time limits. The
portion of the fee expended on the national criminal history records
check for any such permit that was not issued or renewed shall not be
refunded.
Public Act No. 26-41 18 of 19

Substitute House Bill No. 5043
Governor's Action:
Approved May 26, 2026
Public Act No. 26-41 19 of 19